California, session 20252026, AB2230.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Since 2025, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement officers have terrorized California residents, United States citizens, and noncitizens alike through untargeted arrests and brutality based on nothing more than subjects’ racial appearances, languages spoken, means of earning a living, and expression protected under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.(b) California is home to more than 10,000,000 immigrants, most of whom are naturalized United States citizens.(c) Law enforcement activities, including immigration enforcement, in schools and childcare facilities have traumatized children and dissuaded hundreds of thousands of Hispanic and Asian children from attending school or utilizing childcare facilities.(d) Ensuring that childcare facilities are safe and free from violence is a matter of statewide concern.SEC. 2. Section 1596.7997 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1596.7997. (a) Except as required by state or federal law or as required to administer a state or federally supported early care and learning program, employees of a licensed child daycare facility shall not allow an officer or employee of an agency conducting immigration enforcement provide voluntary consent to a law enforcement officer to enter a nonpublic area of a licensed child daycare facility without being unless presented with a valid judicial warrant or warrant, judicial subpoena, or a court order. order or if exigent circumstances exist. Any employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall, to the extent practicable, request a valid identification from an officer or employee of an agency conducting immigration enforcement a law enforcement officer seeking to enter a nonpublic area of a licensed child daycare facility. This subdivision does not apply to law enforcement officers who are complying with the requirements of the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit a licensed child daycare facility’s or employee’s right to consult with counsel or challenge the validity of a warrant, subpoena, or court order in a court of competent jurisdiction.(b) A violation of this section is not subject to criminal, civil, or administrative penalty, and shall not result in a licensee being subject to citation under this act.SEC. 3.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.